Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.055

Falsification—Penalty.

(1) Any person who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system, except under subsection (2) of this section, in any attempt to defraud such system as a result of such act, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Any person who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement systems related to a member's separation from service and qualification for a retirement allowance under RCW 41.32.480 in any attempt to defraud that system as a result of such an act, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2007 c 50 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 218; 1947 c 80 s 67; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-86. Prior: 1937 c 221 s 10. Formerly RCW 41.32.670.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.